District of Columbia statutes.
21-1711

Cases not provided for by chapter.

In a case not provided for by this chapter the rules of law and equity, including the law merchant and those rules of law and equity relating to trusts, agency, negotiable instruments, and banking, continue to apply.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 778, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-1711.
1973 Ed., § 21-1711.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 12 of the Uniform Fiduciaries Act.